en: phytosterol esters
fr: esters de phytostérols

en: cucumber, cucumbers
ar: الخيار
bg: краставица, краставици
ca: cogombre
cs: Okurek
da: agurk, agurker
el: Αγγούρι
eo: serpentkukumo
es: pepino
et: kurk, kurgid
fi: kurkku, kurkut
fr: concombre
ga: Cúcamar
he: מלפפון, מלפפונים
hr: krastavac, krastavci
hu: uborka
it: cetrioli
ja: 胡瓜
lv: gurķi
nb: agurk
nl: komkommer, komkommers, snackkomkommers
nn: agurk
nv: Taʼneeskʼání áłtsʼóózígíí
pl: Ogórek, ogórki, ogórka, ogórkowy, ogórkowa, ogórkowe
pt: pepino
ro: Castravete, castraveți
ru: огурец, огурцы
sd: کيرو
sk: uhorka
sl: Kumara
sv: gurka, gurkor
tr: salatalık, hıyar
za: lwgbieng
zh: 黄瓜

en: raw cucumber pulp and peel
fr: Concombre pulpe et peau cru
it: polpa e buccia di cetriolo crudo

en: raw Cucumber pulp
fr: Concombre pulpe cru

en: baby cucumber, baby cucumbers, small cucumber, raw gherkin, unpickled gherkin
sv: smågurka, smågurkor, smågurk

en: pickled cucumber
da: syltet agurk, syltede agurker

en: pickled gherkin, pickle, pickles
bg: корнишон, кисела краставичка, кисели краставички, краставички, корнишони
da: cornichon
de: Cornichons
es: pepinillos
fi: cocktailkurkku, pikkukurkku
fr: cornichon, cornichons
hr: kiseli krastavci
it: cetriolini
nl: augurken, augurk
pl: korniszon, korniszony, ogórek konserwowy, ogórki konserwowe
ro: castraveți murați

en: gherkin, pickled or unpickled gherkin
sv: inläggningsgurka

en: vinegar gherkin
de: kleine Essiggurken, Essiggurke, Gewürzgurke
fr: cornichon au vinaigre, cornichons au vinaigre
hr: ocat kornišon
it: aceto di cetriolino
nl: augurken op azijn

cs: kvašáky
de: Salzgurke
pl: ogórki kiszone, ogórek kiszony, ogórki kwaszone, ogórek kwaszony
ru: cолёные огурцы
sv: saltgurka, saltgurkor

en: vinegar cucumbers
de: Essiggurken
fi: etikkakurkut
fr: concombres au vinaigre
hr: ocat krastavci
it: cetrioli all'aceto

en: cucumber juice
bg: сок от краставица
de: Gurkensaft
es: zumo de pepino, jugo de pepino
fi: kurkkumehu
fr: jus de concombre
hr: sok od krastavaca
it: Succo di cocomero
nl: komkommersap

en: cucumber juice from concentrate
da: agurkejuice fra koncentrat
de: Gurkensaft aus Gurkensaftkonzentrat
es: zumo de pepino a partir de concentrado, jugo de pepino procedente de concentrado
fi: kurkkumehu tiivisteestä
fr: jus de concombre à base de concentré
hr: sok od krastavca iz koncentrata
it: succo di cetriolo da concentrato
nl: komkommersap uit concentraat

en: poultry
af: pluimvee
ar: دواجن
bg: домашна птица
bn: পোল্ট্রি
bs: Domaća perad
ca: Aviram
cs: domácí drůbež
cy: Dofednod
da: Fjerkræ
de: Geflügel
el: πουλερικά
eo: Kortobirdo
es: ave de corral
et: Kodulind
eu: Etxeko hegazti
fa: ماکیان
fi: siipikarja
fr: volaille
fy: Plomfee
ga: Éanlaith clóis
gl: Ave de curral
he: בשר עוף
hi: पोल्ट्री
hr: perad
ht: Volay
hu: Baromfi
hy: Թռչնաբուծություն
id: unggas
io: Pultro
it: pollame
ja: 家禽
ka: მეფრინველეობა
kk: Құс шаруашылығы
ko: 가금
lt: Paukštiena
mk: живина
ms: unggas
my: ကြက်
nb: fjærkre
nl: pluimvee
nn: fjørfe
pa: ਪੋਲਟਰੀ
pl: drób, drobiowy, drobiowa, drobiowe
pt: ave de capoeira
ro: păsări de casă
ru: домашняя птица
sh: Živina
sk: hydina
sq: Shpezët
sr: живина
sv: fjäderfä
ta: கோழியின வளர்ப்புப் பறவைகள்
tk: Guşçulyk
tl: Poltri
tr: kümes hayvanları
tt: Кошчылык
uk: свійські птахи
uz: Parrandachilik
vi: gia cầm
wa: Poytreye
yi: עופות
zh: 家禽

en: poultry protein
it: proteine di pollame
pl: białko drobiowe

en: poultry meat
bg: птиче месо
da: Fjerkrækød
de: Geflügelfleisch
es: Carne de ave
fi: siipikarjanliha
fr: viande de volaille
hr: meso peradi
hu: baromfihús
it: Carne di pollame
ja: 鳥肉
nl: Vlees van gevogelte
pl: Mięso drobiowe, mięsa drobiowego
sv: Fjäderfäkött

en: mechanically separated poultry meat
bg: механично сепарирано птиче месо
fr: viande de volaille séparée mécaniquement, viande séparée mécaniquement de volaille
hr: strojno otkošteno meso peradi
it: carne di pollame separata meccanicamente

en: poultry skin
bg: птича кожа
de: Geflügelhaut
es: Piel de ave
fi: siipikarjan nahka
fr: peau de volaille
hr: koža peradi
it: Pelle di pollame
nl: gevogeltevel
pl: skórki drobiowe, skórki z drobiu

en: poultry liver
de: Geflügel-leber
fi: siipikarjan maksa
fr: foie de volaille
hr: jetra peradi
it: fegato di pollame
nl: gevogeltelever
pl: wątróbka drobiowa
zh: 禽类肝脏

en: poultry extract
de: Geflügelfleischextrakt
fr: extrait de volaille
hr: ekstrakt peradi
it: estratto di pollame